Georgia statutes. 
(2) As used in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the term "local constitutional amendment" means any constitutional amendment described in subparagraph (a) of Paragraph IV of Section I of Article XI of the Constitution of the State of Georgia which has been continued in force and effect pursuant to the authority of said subparagraph (a) of said cited constitutional provision and which has not been repealed pursuant to the authority of subparagraph (b) of said cited constitutional provision.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-1-21, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 764, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1627, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 36.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Ga. L. 1986, p. 764, § 1 and Ga. L. 1986, p. 1586, § 1 both enacted Code sections designated 36-1-21. The Code section enacted by the latter Act was redesignated as Code Section 36-1-22 [repealed] pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5.

Law reviews. - For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Motion to create system. - Motion adopted by the board of county commissioners creating a county personnel system was a "resolution" within the meaning of O.C.G.A. § 36-1-21. Wayne County v. Herrin, 210 Ga. App. 747, 437 S.E.2d 793 (1993).

Inapplicable to system created by General Assembly. - Because a county tax commissioner's employees were within the county's civil service system, the county was properly granted summary judgment as to that issue, and hence, the county's personnel director was authorized to refuse to implement raises to the employees as the commissioner sought; moreover, the commissioner's reliance on O.C.G.A. § 36-1-21 did not change the result, as that statute expressly applied only to civil service systems created by county governing authorities, and the civil service system at issue was created by the Georgia General Assembly. Ferdinand v. Bd. of Comm'rs, 281 Ga. 643, 641 S.E.2d 787 (2007).

Subsequent ordinance or resolution. - After the governing body of a county has authorized, by ordinance or resolution, the creation of a civil service commission to cover county employees other than elected officials or persons appointed for a definite term, it may by subsequent ordinance or resolution provide that employees of the departments of elected officials or other county bodies may, by written application of the elected official or other department head, seek to be brought under the civil service commission as well. Burbridge v. Hensley, 194 Ga. App. 523, 391 S.E.2d 5, cert. denied, 194 Ga. App. 911, 391 S.E.2d 5 (1990).

Interim appointed sheriff's attempt, by letter to the county clerk, to have the sheriff's employees covered by the provisions of a civil service ordinance was invalid, since the county had not enacted a second ordinance or resolution pursuant to subsection (b) of O.C.G.A. § 36-1-21 providing that employees of elected officials could be made subject to the civil service system by written application of the elected official. Burbridge v. Hensley, 194 Ga. App. 523, 391 S.E.2d 5, cert. denied, 194 Ga. App. 911, 391 S.E.2d 5 (1990).

Resolution of the board of county commissioners that allowed elected county officials to bring portions of employment within their department into the personnel system complied with the dictates of O.C.G.A. § 36-1-21. Wayne County v. Herrin, 210 Ga. App. 747, 437 S.E.2d 793 (1993).

Appointment and discharge of deputies. - Once positions in a sheriff's office have been made subject to a personnel or civil service system, a sheriff's authority to appoint deputies pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 15-16-23 is limited to vacancies created by the removal of employees in the manner provided under the applicable personnel or civil service system or vacancies created when employees resign or retire. Wayne County v. Herrin, 210 Ga. App. 747, 437 S.E.2d 793 (1993).

Since the county created a personnel system applicable to the sheriff's department, a newly elected sheriff's termination of current employees without affording the employees due process rights in connection with the employees' dismissal and the sheriff's hiring of employees to replace the dismissed employees was improper. Wayne County v. Herrin, 210 Ga. App. 747, 437 S.E.2d 793 (1993).

Since it was not clearly established at the time in question that a sheriff was bound by a county merit system and that employees of the sheriff had a property interest in the employees' jobs, the sheriff was entitled to qualified immunity from the employees' claim of wrongful termination from the employee's jobs. Aspinwall v. Herrin, 879 F. Supp. 1227 (S.D. Ga. 1994).

Deputy sheriffs in a county that had not adopted a civil service program were employees at will and lacked a property interest in the deputies' employment. Zimmerman v. Cherokee County, 925 F. Supp. 777 (N.D. Ga. 1995).

Under O.C.G.A. § 15-16-23, sheriffs have absolute discretion in the hiring and firing of deputies and the only process by which this discretion may be limited is through adoption of a civil service system in compliance with subsection (b) of O.C.G.A. § 36-1-21; when a sheriff had not complied with such provision, deputies had no protected property interest in the deputies' positions. Brett v. Jefferson County, 925 F. Supp. 786 (S.D. Ga. 1996), aff'd in part and vacated in part, 123 F.3d 1429 (11th Cir. 1997).

Because sheriff had failed to satisfy statutory requirements for placing deputies under a civil service program, the deputies were at-will employees with no protected property interest in continued employment. Brett v. Jefferson County, 123 F.3d 1429 (11th Cir. 1997).

Political patronage of sheriff deputies. - Deputy sheriff's First Amendment political patronage claim failed because political loyalty was an appropriate requirement for the position of deputy sheriff as Georgia deputies had the same powers and duties as the sheriff; the civil service system, which prohibited the sheriff from making employment decisions on the basis of political affiliation, did not modify the duties of the sheriff's deputies and therefore had no effect on the First Amendment claim. Ezell v. Wynn, 802 F.3d 1217 (11th Cir. 2015).

Termination of employee. - Employee who was hired by a county solicitor general under O.C.G.A. § 15-18-71 was not an employee of the county, and the solicitor general did not bring the employee into the county's civil service system under O.C.G.A. § 36-1-21(b). Therefore, the employee lacked a protected property interest in the job and could be terminated without cause and without a hearing. Thomas v. Lee, 286 Ga. 860, 691 S.E.2d 845 (2010).

Court clerk not subject to county merit system. - County merit board can take no action affecting the clerk of the superior court and the clerk's employees unless the clerk of the superior court has asked that the clerk's office be subject to the merit system and the county has provided for such coverage through an appropriate resolution or ordinance. Gwinnett County v. Yates, 265 Ga. 504, 458 S.E.2d 791 (1995).

Clerk of the Superior Court of Gwinnett County is not subject to the Gwinnett County Merit System. Gwinnett County v. Yates, 265 Ga. 504, 458 S.E.2d 791 (1995).

No vested interest in continued employment shown. - In a racial discrimination suit, the trial court properly denied mandamus relief to the former employee because the former employee failed to show that the employer had a clear legal duty to maintain the former employee as an employee and there was no evidence showing that the former employee was ever a merit system employee with a vested interest in continued employment with the tax commissioner. Cochran v. Kendrick, 297 Ga. 655, 778 S.E.2d 1 (2015).

Cited in Floyd v. Chaffin, 201 Ga. App. 597, 411 S.E.2d 570 (1991); Epps v. Watson, F.3d (M.D. Ga. May 25, 2006).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

5B Am. Jur. Pleading and Practice Forms, Civil Service, § 2.

36-1-22. Business and occupational license taxes and fees.

Statute text

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1292, § 6, effective January 1, 1995.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - This Code section was based on Code 1981, § 36-1-22, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1586, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1734, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 36.

36-1-23. Purchase from county of materials used in the construction of water systems, sewer systems, storm and drainage systems, buildings, or other facilities.

Statute text

(a) No county shall require any person who performs services on his property or on private property pursuant to an agreement with an individual, corporation, partnership, association, or other private entity to purchase from the county any materials used in the construction or repair of any water system, sewer system, storm or drainage system, building, or other facilities on such property. Any county which sells such materials used in the construction of such facilities shall be required to publish the acceptable manufacturing or engineering standards of such materials sold by the county and such other materials, if any, which the county finds acceptable for the construction of such facilities. In the construction of any such facility, the use by any person or other entity of materials which are not purchased from the county shall not render any such facility or project ineligible for acceptance as a public right of way or utility project if the materials used meet the acceptable standards published by the county.

(b) Nothing in this Code section shall affect the authority of a county to enact building, construction, electrical, fire, or other codes which require materials used in the construction or repair of water systems, sewer systems, storm or drainage systems, buildings, or other facilities to meet or satisfy certain standards.

(c) Any county officer or employee who, without sufficient cause, refuses to accept as a public right of way or utility project any water and sewer system or other facility constructed with acceptable materials not purchased from the county shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) Upon the final conviction of any county officer or employee of violating subsection (c) of this Code section, the employment of such officer or employee by the county shall immediately be terminated.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-1-23, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1002, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3212, § 1.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Former Code Section 36-1-23, pertaining to preservation and protection of abandoned or unmaintained cemeteries, was enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 318, § 1 and repealed by Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 36.

36-1-24. Training classes for clerks of governing authority of county.

Statute text

(a) Any person hired or appointed to serve as the clerk of the governing authority of any county in this state shall attend and complete a course of training on matters pertaining to the basic performance of his or her official duties. Such training shall be conducted by the University of Georgia under the supervision of the Carl Vinson Institute of Government at such time and place as shall be determined by the Carl Vinson Institute of Government.

(b) The personnel of the Carl Vinson Institute of Government are authorized to work with the members of the Association County Clerks of Georgia and the Association County Commissioners of Georgia in establishing and operating the training course provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section, as well as establishing the rules and regulations governing attendance of such training.

(c) All reasonable expenses of attending the training class required by this Code section shall be paid from funds appropriated by the county governing authority for such purposes.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-1-24, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1689, § 1.)

36-1-25. Official minutes of meetings.

Statute text

Official minutes of the meetings of a county governing authority shall be maintained in the offices of the county governing authority. Copies of contracts, maps, or similar material or documents related to actions taken by a county governing authority may be included in the minutes or incorporated by reference to an alternate location. Where incorporated by reference, such documents shall be stored in a central location or locations identified by ordinance or resolution of the county governing authority.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-1-25, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 662, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Zoning map properly incorporated by reference. - County zoning ordinance properly incorporated by reference an official zoning map as the board of commissioners had a zoning map before the board when the board considered the ordinance, the zoning map was in existence when a limited liability limited partnership (LLLP) bought the property and that map was kept in the zoning administrator's office, the new zoning administrator's uncertainty about which of two maps was the official map did not render the entire zoning ordinance invalid, and it was clear that the LLLP's land was not zoned for a landfill. Mid-Georgia Envtl. Mgmt. Group, L.L.L.P. v. Meriwether County, 277 Ga. 670, 594 S.E.2d 344 (2004).

36-1-26. Contracts for utility services; terms and conditions.

Statute text

The governing authority of any county in this state may authorize the execution of one or more contracts which specify the rates, fees, or other charges which will be charged and collected by the county for electric, natural gas, or water utility services to be provided by the county to one or more of its utility customers. Any such contract shall be subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, no such contract shall be for a term in excess of ten years.

(B) No such contract for solar utility services or for wind utility services shall be for a term in excess of 20 years;

(2) Any such contract which is for a term in excess of two years shall include commercially reasonable provisions under which the rates, fees, or other charges shall be adjusted with respect to inflationary or deflationary factors affecting the provision of the utility service in question; and

(3) Any such contract shall include commercially reasonable provisions relieving the county from its obligations under the contract in the event that the county's ability to comply with the contract is impaired by war, natural disaster, catastrophe, or any other emergency creating conditions under which the county's compliance with the contract would become impossible or create a substantial financial burden upon the county or its taxpayers.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-1-26, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1113, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 605, § 1/SB 95.)

Annotations

The 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, rewrote paragraph (1), which read: "No such contract shall be for a term in excess of ten years;".

36-1-27. Referendum approval required prior to expenditure of public funds for establishment of fixed guideway transit; definitions; submission of the question to qualified voters; ballot language.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term:

(1) "Expenditure of public funds" means:

(A) Utilizing the proceeds of any tax, proceeds from the county general fund, or any other county proceeds;

(B) Incurring general obligation debt, revenue debt, or other multiyear obligations; or

(C) Entering into any intergovernmental agreement with an authority or instrumentality of the state which would impact future tax revenue or obligate the payment of tax revenue, general obligation debt, revenue debt, or other multiyear obligations.

(2) "Fixed guideway transit" means a public transportation system using and occupying a permanent, separate right of way for the exclusive use of public transportation, including, but not limited to, rails for use by trains or a bus rapid transit system.

(3) "Mass transportation" means any mode of transportation serving the general public which is appropriate to transport people by highways or rail.

(4) "Mass transportation regional system participant" means any county within a special district created pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 8 of Title 48 in which mass transportation is provided within such special district, to such special district, or from such special district by a multicounty regional transportation authority created by an Act of the General Assembly, including but not limited to the Atlanta-region Transit Link "ATL" Authority or the Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority.

(b) Prior to an expenditure of any public funds for the establishment, maintenance, and operation of a fixed guideway transit in any county that is a mass transportation regional system participant, the governing authority of such county shall obtain approval from:

(1) The Atlanta-region Transit Link "ATL" Authority that such project is on the regional transit plan adopted by such authority pursuant to Code Section 50-39-12; and

(2) A majority of qualified voters of the county in a separate referendum question as provided for in this Code section.

(c) Prior to the issuance of the call for the referendum, the governing authority of the county that is a mass transportation regional system participant shall adopt a resolution which shall specify the type and location of a fixed guideway transit, the capital costs to establish such fixed guideway transit, the date upon which the capital costs to establish such fixed guideway transit shall be paid in full, and an estimate of the projected annual costs for maintenance and operation of such fixed guideway transit.

(d) (1) Whenever the governing authority of any county that is a mass transportation regional system participant wishes to submit to the electors of such county the question of whether to expend public funds for a fixed guideway transit, any such governing authority shall notify the election superintendent of such county by forwarding to the superintendent a copy of a resolution of the governing authority calling for a referendum election. Such election shall be held with a general election, general primary election, or presidential preference primary. Upon receipt of the resolution, it shall be the duty of the election superintendent to issue the call for an election for the purpose of submitting the question of authorizing the expenditure of public funds for a fixed guideway transit to the voters of the county for approval or rejection. The election superintendent shall issue the call and shall conduct the election on a date and in the manner authorized under Code Section 21-2-540. The election superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election along with a copy of the resolution adopted pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section to be published once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date of the election in the official organ of such county. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the following:

"( ) YES Shall the expenditure of public funds for a

( ) NO fixed guideway transit within ____________ County be approved?"

(2) All persons desiring to vote in favor of the question shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring to vote against the question shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast are in favor of the question, then the expenditure of public funds by such county for a fixed guideway transit shall be deemed approved; otherwise, such expenditures shall continue to be prohibited. It shall be the duty of the election superintendent to hold and conduct such elections under the same rules and regulations as govern general elections. It shall be the superintendent's further duty to canvass the returns, declare the result of the election, and certify the result to the Secretary of State. The expense of the election shall be borne by the county holding the election.

(e) This Code section shall not apply to the extension of a fixed guideway transit or levy of applicable sales and use taxes authorized pursuant to an Act known as the "Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority Act of 1965," approved March 10, 1965 (Ga. L. 1965, p. 2243), as amended, or Part 2 of Chapter 9 of Title 32 for which any referendum required under such Act or part shall control, or to any project within a county or between counties which have approved such sales and use tax, provided that such project is wholly within the territorial boundaries of such county or counties.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-1-27, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 862, § 1/SB 420; Ga. L. 2018, p. 377, § 4-5/HB 930.)

Annotations

The 2018 amendment, effective May 3, 2018, substituted "Atlanta-region Transit Link 'ATL' Authority" for "Georgia Regional Transportation Authority" near the end of paragraph (a)(4); substituted the present provisions of subsection (b) for the former provisions, which read: "Prior to an expenditure of any public funds for the establishment, maintenance, and operation of a fixed guideway transit in any county that is a mass transportation regional system participant, the governing authority of such county shall obtain approval from a majority of qualified voters of the county in a separate referendum question as provided for in this Code section."; and, in the middle of subsection (e), substituted "known as the 'Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority Act of 1965,' approved March 10, 1965 (Ga. L. 1965, p. 2243), as amended, or Part 2 of Chapter 9 of Title 32" for "approved March 10, 1965 (Ga. L. 1965, p. 2243), as amended, the 'Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority Act of 1965,"', and inserted "or part". See Editor's notes for applicability.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2018, p. 377, § 5-1(c)/HB 930, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "Tax, penalty, and interest liabilities for prior taxable years shall not be affected by the passage of Part I of this Act and shall continue to be governed by the provisions of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated as it existed immediately prior to the effective date of Part I of this Act." Part I of this Act became effective January 1, 2019.

——————————

CHAPTER 2

MILITIA DISTRICTS

Sec.

36-2-1. Division of county into militia districts.

36-2-2. Minimum requirements for districts.

36-2-3. Appointment of commissioners to change districts; employment and compensation of surveyor; approval of commissioners' report by judge of probate court.

36-2-4. Transmittal of proceedings changing districts to Governor; publication.

36-2-5 through 36-2-7 [Repealed].

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Effect of recognition of old district line by commissioners after change of line. - Public would not be estopped by any subsequent acts of the board of commissioners in recognizing an old line between two districts as the correct dividing line, had the district lines been changed in compliance with the requirements of law. Camp v. Trapp, 209 Ga. 298, 71 S.E.2d 534 (1952).

Cited in United States v. Bibb County Democratic Executive Comm., 222 F. Supp. 493 (M.D. Ga. 1962); Grimes v. Clark, 226 Ga. 195, 173 S.E.2d 686 (1970).

36-2-1. Division of county into militia districts.

Statute text

(a) Each county is divided into militia districts according to its territory and population.

(b) Militia districts are to remain the same as presently organized until changed in the manner prescribed in this chapter.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, §§ 453, 454; Code 1868, §§ 515, 516; Code 1873, §§ 481, 482; Code 1882, §§ 481, 482; Civil Code 1895, §§ 330, 331; Civil Code 1910, §§ 373, 374; Code 1933, §§ 23-201, 23-202.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Johnson v. Chappell, 198 Ga. 162, 30 S.E.2d 909 (1944).

36-2-2. Minimum requirements for districts.

Statute text

Each militia district organized or changed must contain within its limits at least 200 persons 18 years of age or over who are residents at the time of the organization of the district and, in its formation, must not leave any older district with less than 200 such persons.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 455; Code 1868, § 517; Code 1873, § 483; Code 1882, § 483; Civil Code 1895, § 332; Civil Code 1910, § 375; Code 1933, § 23-203; Ga. L. 1982, p. 825, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Composition of unorganized militia of the state, § 38-2-3.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

O.C.G.A. § 36-2-2 is mandatory. - Proceeding which seeks to create a new district, but leaves an old district with less than the required number of male persons subject to militia duty, is repugnant to this section. Johnson v. Chappell, 198 Ga. 162, 30 S.E.2d 909 (1944).

Order void when existing district left understrength. - Order, by the proper county authority, approving a report of the commissioners appointed to lay out and establish a new militia district, is void since, by the establishment of the new district, an existing district is left with less than the required number of persons liable to militia duty. Johnson v. Chappell, 198 Ga. 162, 30 S.E.2d 909 (1944).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

The 1982 amendment to O.C.G.A. § 36-2-2 does not require that any militia district boundaries be changed; any changes are to be initiated by the board of county commissioners in counties where the board is vested with this power by local law. 1982 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 82-94.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Enlistment or mustering of minors into military service, 140 A.L.R. 1508.

36-2-3. Appointment of commissioners to change districts; employment and compensation of surveyor; approval of commissioners' report by judge of probate court.

Statute text

Whenever it is necessary and expedient to lay out a new militia district, to change the lines of old districts, or to consolidate or abolish old districts, the judge of the probate court may, at any time, appoint three commissioners who are citizens of the district or districts from which it is proposed to make the new district or to change the lines thereof, whose duty it shall be to lay out and define the lines and to report the same to the judge of the probate court. The commissioners shall have authority to engage the services of a competent surveyor to assist them in their duties. The surveyor shall be paid for his services, out of the county treasury, the same compensation county surveyors are paid for similar services rendered to a citizen. If the judge of the probate court approves the report of the commissioners, he shall have all proceedings in the matter entered on his minutes, after which the district laid out or the line changed or defined shall be known and regarded accordingly.

History

(Laws 1840, Cobb's 1851 Digest, p. 187; Code 1863, §§ 456, 457, 458; Code 1868, §§ 518, 519, 520; Code 1873, §§ 484, 485, 486; Code 1882, §§ 484, 485, 486; Civil Code 1895, §§ 333, 334, 335; Civil Code 1910, §§ 376, 377, 378; Code 1933, §§ 23-204, 23-205, 23-206.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Compensation of county surveyors, § 36-7-9 et seq.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

This section is a general law. Drummond v. Lowry, 88 Ga. 716, 16 S.E. 28 (1892); Hackney v. Leake, 91 Ga. 141, 16 S.E. 966 (1893).

Commissioners appointed by the ordinaries to lay out new militia districts, or change the lines of those existing, have authority to engage the services of a competent surveyor to assist the commissioners in the commissioners' duties. The commissioners are not limited to the county surveyor. Graham v. Hall, 68 Ga. 354 (1882).

Power of ordinary (now judge of the probate court) and time of action. - Ordinary (now judge of the probate court) may appoint the commissioners, receive the commissioners' reports, and establish new districts either in term or vacation. Poole v. Sims, 67 Ga. 36 (1881).

Ordinary (now judge of the probate court) determines expediency. - Commissioners are mere agents to lay off the lines of a new district; the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) determines the expediency of creating it. The creation of a new district is not, therefore, illegal because deemed inexpedient by the commissioners. Conley v. Poole, 67 Ga. 254 (1881).

Finality of decision. - Judge of a superior court has no jurisdiction to review by certiorari the action of an ordinary (now judge of the probate court) or board of commissioners for there is no decision of a judicial question between parties litigant. Hillsman v. Harris, 84 Ga. 432, 11 S.E. 400 (1890); Hudson v. Sullivan, 93 Ga. 631, 20 S.E. 77 (1894).

Decision to create district not subject to review. - Exercise of the discretion of the county authority in creating a militia district, in the absence of fraud or the willful abuse of discretion, could not be made the subject of review by the superior court or the Supreme Court. Johnson v. Chappell, 198 Ga. 162, 30 S.E.2d 909 (1944).

New district must not leave old district undermanned. - An order, by the proper county authority, approving a report of the commissioners appointed to lay out and establish a new militia district, is void since, by the establishment of the new district, an existing district is left with less than the required number of persons liable to militia duty. Johnson v. Chappell, 198 Ga. 162, 30 S.E.2d 909 (1944).

Proof of district lines and residence. - Change of district lines is a matter of record, but the location of a residence with reference thereto must be proved by parol evidence. Graham v. Hall, 68 Ga. 354 (1882).

Isolated tracts. - This section does not authorize the inclusion in a district of isolated tracts not contiguous thereto. Howell v. Kinney, 99 Ga. 544, 27 S.E. 204 (1896).

Justice of the peace (now magistrate) whose fees will be diminished by change in the militia district is not entitled to notice of proceedings. Poole v. Sims, 67 Ga. 36 (1881).

Form of petition and report. - Petition for a change of boundary line should distinctly specify the location of the new line, and the commissioners' report should lay out and define the new line. Howell v. Kinney, 99 Ga. 544, 27 S.E. 204 (1896).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Judge may change district name. - Since the judge of the probate court has all of the powers specified in this section, which are quite extensive, then certainly the judge has the power as implied by law to merely change the name of a militia district without changing the district's boundaries. 1963-65 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 339.

Commissioners of a county have authority to consolidate militia districts of that county into one militia district; the responsibility for changing the boundaries of, or consolidation of militia districts is that of the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) only when jurisdiction over such matters has not been granted by legislative act to the county commissioners. 1968 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 68-177.

Change in city limits is not one of means specified in the laws of Georgia for changing the boundaries of militia districts. 1968 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 68-237.

The 1982 amendment to O.C.G.A. § 36-2-2 does not require that any militia district boundaries be changed; any changes are to be initiated by the board of county commissioners in counties where the board is vested with this power by local law. 1982 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 82-94.

36-2-4. Transmittal of proceedings changing districts to Governor; publication.

Statute text

It is the duty of the judge of the probate court, when a new district is laid out, immediately to transmit to the Governor the proceedings in the matter, duly certified, from his minutes and to publish them for 30 days at the door of the courthouse and in the newspaper where he does his official advertising.

History

(Laws 1840, Cobb's 1851 Digest, p. 187; Code 1863, § 459; Code 1868, § 521; Code 1873, § 487; Code 1882, § 487; Civil Code 1895, § 336; Civil Code 1910, § 379; Code 1933, § 23-207.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Numbers and names of militia districts are not required to be kept in executive department. Aultman v. Hodge, 150 Ga. 370, 104 S.E. 1 (1920).

36-2-5 through 36-2-7.

Statute text

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 4-2, effective July 1, 1983.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - These Code sections, relating to effect on justices of the peace, constables, and actions pending in justice's court in the old district and election of justices of the peace and constables in new districts upon addition, consolidation, and abolition of militia districts, were based on Orig. Code 1863, §§ 460 to 462; Code 1868, §§ 522 to 524; Code 1873, §§ 488 to 490; Code 1882, §§ 488 to 490; Code 1895, §§ 337 to 339; Ga. L. 1899, p. 24, § 1; Civil Code 1910, §§ 380 to 382; Code 1933, §§ 23-208 to 23-210; and Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8.

——————————

CHAPTER 3

COUNTY BOUNDARIES

Article 1

Change of Boundaries.

36-3-1. Filing and contents of petition for change of boundary line; publication of notice.

36-3-2. Proceedings before grand juries; action by county governing authorities upon approval of change by grand juries; publication of notice of approval by judges of probate courts.

36-3-3. When new boundary lines deemed established.

36-3-4. Payment of costs of proceedings.

36-3-5. Filing of survey, plat, and resolution relating to change of boundary with Secretary of State; disposition thereof; recordation of certified copy by clerks of superior courts.

Article 2

Settlement of Boundary Disputes.

36-3-20. Presentment of boundary dispute by grand jury; certification to Governor; appointment of surveyor to define line; return of survey and plat to Secretary of State.

36-3-21. Service of notice of survey upon county authorities.

36-3-21.1. Counties' agreement to boundary lines; filing of resolutions.

36-3-22. Copy of survey and plat furnished to county authorities.

36-3-23. Filing of survey and plat with Secretary of State; time for protest or exceptions thereto.

36-3-24. Notice and hearing of protest or exceptions by Secretary of State.

36-3-25. Recordation of survey and plat; conclusive effect; subsequent changes of boundary line.

36-3-26. Compensation of land surveyor; notification of county authorities of fee; advisory committee.

36-3-27. Payment by county authorities of compensation; tax levy.

Annotations

Cross references. - County boundaries generally, Vol. 42, Index of Local and Special Laws.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Presumption of compliance with statute. - An order of the Governor appointing a surveyor to make a survey and plat of a disputed county line will be presumed, until the contrary appears, to have been made in full compliance with statutes providing for settlement of disputed county line. Fine v. Dade County, 198 Ga. 655, 32 S.E.2d 246 (1944).

When lands sought to be taxed by one county become part of another county, this status remains until there is another survey of line, after which the lands became a part of the former county. Kennedy v. Howard, 183 Ga. 410, 188 S.E. 673 (1936).

Cited in Calhoun County v. Early County, 205 Ga. 169, 52 S.E.2d 854 (1949).

——————————

ARTICLE 1

CHANGE OF BOUNDARIES

Annotations

Cross references. - Limitation of number of counties to 159, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. I, Para. II(a).

Changing of county lines by operation of general law only and consolidation, merger, or division of counties generally, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. I, Para. II(b) and (c).

Change in boundaries of election districts within counties, § 21-2-261 et seq.

County boundaries generally, Vol. 42, Index of Local and Special Laws.

36-3-1. Filing and contents of petition for change of boundary line; publication of notice.

Statute text

Whenever one or more citizens of any county desire to have the boundary line of the county changed, they shall file in the offices of the judges of the probate courts of the counties to be affected a petition in writing, setting forth the exact character of the change desired to be made, specifying particularly the situation, direction, and existing marks and monuments, if any, of the original line, and describing particularly the direction, location, and length of the proposed new line, and setting forth the reasons for the change. The person or persons applying for the change shall also give notice of the intention to apply for the change by publishing the same for at least 30 days next preceding the term of the superior court or courts to be held in the counties to be affected, which term shall be that next occurring after the filing of the petition with the judges of the probate courts:

(1) By publishing the notice in a public newspaper having general circulation in each of the counties to be affected by the change; and

(2) By posting the notice at the door of the courthouse in each of the counties and at three public places in every militia district adjacent to the line to be changed.

History

(Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 52, § 1; Code 1882, § 508n; Civil Code 1895, § 382; Civil Code 1910, § 468; Code 1933, § 23-301.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article questioning the constitutionality of this section and the constitutional provision under which it was enacted, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 169 (1975).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - This and the following sections of this chapter constitute a general law and are not unconstitutional. Aultman v. Hodge, 147 Ga. 626, 95 S.E. 297 (1918).

Quantity of land transferred limited by discretion of officials. - When provisions of law have been fully complied with, the quantity of land that may be transferred from one county to another by a change of county line is limited only by the restrictions contained in law; that is, by discretion of those officials named, and by the constitutional provision against removal of county site, or dissolution of a county except in the manner prescribed in Ga. Const. 1877, Art. XI, Sec. 1, Para. IV (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. I, Para. II). Aultman v. Hodge, 147 Ga. 626, 95 S.E. 297 (1918).

Injunction in discretion of judge. - On a petition to enjoin commissioners from passing on recommendation of grand jury sanctioning change of county line, the judge of the superior court did not abuse judicial discretion in refusing an interlocutory injunction on the facts of the case. Aultman v. Hodge, 147 Ga. 626, 95 S.E. 297 (1918).

Notice not required to be posted throughout length of county line. - Provision in this section as to the posting of notice in militia districts does not require the posting of notice in every district throughout the length of the county line unless the line is to be changed throughout the line's entire length. Aultman v. Hodge, 147 Ga. 626, 95 S.E. 297 (1918).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 42, 51, 52, 56, 59, 60.

ALR. - What constitutes newspaper of "general circulation" within meaning of state statutes requiring publication of official notices and the like in such newspaper, 24 A.L.R.4th 822.

36-3-2. Proceedings before grand juries; action by county governing authorities upon approval of change by grand juries; publication of notice of approval by judges of probate courts.

Statute text
